Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. Net Metering

§ 37-16-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless the context or a specific article otherwise requires:

“Commission” means public service commission of Wyoming;

“Customer-generator” means a user of a net metering system;

“Electrical company” means any person, corporation or governmental subdivision, excluding municipalities, authorized and operating under the constitution and laws of the state of Wyoming which is primarily engaged in the generation or sale of electric energy;

“Electric cooperative” means any nonprofit, member-owned cooperative organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming and engaged in the business of distributing electric energy in the state of Wyoming;

“Electric utility” means any electrical company, irrigation district or electric cooperative that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state;

“Irrigation district” means an irrigation district under W.S.

41-7-201

;

“Net metering” means measuring the difference between the electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity generated by a customer-generator that is fed back to the electric utility over the applicable billing period;

“Net metering system” means a facility for the production of electrical energy that:

Uses as its fuel either solar, wind, biomass or hydropower;

Has a generating capacity of not more than twenty-five (25) kilowatts;

Is located on the customer-generator’s premises;

Operates in parallel with the electric utility’s transmission and distribution facilities; and

Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator’s requirements for electricity.

A person acting as a customer-generator under this act [§§

37-16-101

through

37-16-202

] shall not be considered a “public utility” as defined by W.S.

37-1-101

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 95, § 1; 2003, ch. 3, § 2; ch. 154, § 1.

§ 37-16-102.
Electric utility requirements.

An electric utility:

Shall offer to make available to each of its eligible customer-generators that has installed a net metering system an energy meter that is capable of registering the flow of electricity in two (2) directions;

May, at its own expense and with the written consent of the customer-generator, install one (1) or more additional meters to monitor the flow of electricity in each direction;

Shall not charge a customer-generator any fee or charge that would increase the customer-generator’s minimum monthly charge to an amount greater than that of other customers of the electric utility in the same rate class as the customer-generator.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 95, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 37-16-103.
Calculation requirements.

Consistent with other provisions of this chapter, the net energy measurement shall be calculated in the following manner:

The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal metering practices;

If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the electricity generated by the customer generator, the customer-generator shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that month, in accordance with W.S.

37-16-102

;

If the electricity supplied by the customer-generator exceeds that supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator shall be credited or compensated for the excess kilowatt-hours generated during the month with the kilowatt-hour credit or compensation appearing on the bill for the following month for all metered locations of customer-generators supplied by the electric utility.

At the beginning of each calendar year, any remaining unused kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous year shall be sold to the electric utility, at the electric utility’s filed avoided cost.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 95, § 1.

§ 37-16-104.
Safety and performance requirements.

A net metering system used by a customer-generator shall meet all applicable safety and performance standards established by the national electrical code, the institute of electrical and electronics engineers and underwriters laboratories.

The customer-generator shall at its expense provide lockable, switching equipment capable of isolating the net metering facility from the electric utility’s system. Such equipment shall be approved by the electric utility and shall be accessible by the electric utility at all times.

The electric utility shall not be liable directly or indirectly for permitting or continuing to allow an attachment of a net metering facility, or for acts or omissions of the customer-generator that cause loss or injury, including death, to any third party.

The customer-generator is responsible for all costs associated with its facility and is also responsible for all costs related to any modifications to the facility that may be required by the electric utility for purposes of safety and reliability.

The commission, after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment, may adopt by regulation additional control and testing requirements for customer-generators that the commission determines are necessary to protect public safety and system reliability.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 95, § 1.